Hawaii statutes.
[§657D-24] Settlement of cases involving
stayed proceedings to foreclose mortgage on, resume possession of, or terminate
contract for purchase of, personal property. Where a proceeding to
foreclose a mortgage upon or to resume possession of personal property, or to
rescind or terminate a contract for its purchase, has been stayed as provided
in this chapter, the court, unless in its opinion an undue hardship would
result to the dependents of the person in the military service, may appoint
three disinterested parties to appraise the property and, based upon the report
of the appraisers, order that sum, if any, as may be just, paid to the person
in military service or the person's dependent, as the case may be, as a
condition of foreclosing the mortgage, resuming possession of the property, or
rescinding or terminating the contract. [L 1994, c 257, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next